Missouri, session 2026, SB1211.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 139.053, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 139.053,
to read as follows:
139.053. 1. The governing body of any county[,
excluding township counties,] may by ordinance or order
provide for the payment of all or any part of current real
and personal property taxes which are owed, at the option of
the taxpayer, on an annual, semiannual or quarterly basis at
such times as determined by such governing body.
2. The ordinance shall provide the method by which the
amount of property taxes owed for the current tax year in
which the payments are to be made shall be estimated. The
collector shall submit to the governing body the procedures
by which taxes will be collected pursuant to the ordinance
or order. The estimate shall be based on the previous tax
year's liability. A taxpayer's payment schedule shall be
based on the estimate divided by the number of pay periods
in which payments are to be made. The taxpayer shall at the
end of the tax year pay any amounts owed in excess of the
estimate for such year. The county shall at the end of the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1211 2
tax year refund to the taxpayer any amounts paid in excess
of the property tax owed for such year. No interest shall
be paid by the county on excess amounts owed to the
taxpayer. Any refund paid the taxpayer pursuant to this
subsection shall be an amount paid by the county only once
in a calendar year.
3. If a taxpayer fails to make an installment payment
of a portion of the real or personal property taxes owed to
the county, then such county may charge the taxpayer
interest on the amount of property taxes still owed for that
year.
4. Any governing body enacting the ordinance or order
specified in this section shall first agree to provide the
county collector with reasonable and necessary funds to
implement the ordinance or order.
5. Subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
payment for real property taxes by financial institutions,
as defined in section 381.410, who pay tax obligations which
they service from escrow accounts, as defined in Title 24,
Part 3500, Section 17, Code of Federal Regulation, as
amended.
✓